Massachusetts, session 194th, S67.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 11 of chapter 131 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following sentence to the end of the section:-
“The George L. Darey inland fisheries and game fund shall be reimbursed annually from
the general fund for all loss of revenue for any fishing or hunting license provided at a discount
and for any license provided free of charge.”
of 1